Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 24 Reporting of New Hires

15-24-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to enhance the enforcement of support obligations by requiring employers to report all new hires or rehires effective October 1, 1997, by establishing a state directory of new hires to be reported to a national directory of new hires, to establish procedures for reporting and penalties for failure to report, in accordance with title IV, part D, § 454 of the Federal Social Security Act, 42 USC § 654, and as defined in §

15-24-2

of this chapter. This chapter shall be construed liberally to effect this purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-2.
General rule on reporting.

On or before the effective date of employment, a new employee must complete a W-4 form as is required by both Rhode Island and federal law, § 3402(f)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 3402(f)(2)(A).

Within fourteen (14) days of the employee’s effective date of employment or effective date of reinstatement, the employer must submit to the department of administration, division of taxation, or its designee, the information as provided in §

15-24-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Compensation” means payment owed by the employer for:

Labor or services rendered by an employee; or

Benefits including, but not limited to, vacation, holiday, and sick leave, and severance payments which are due an employee under an agreement with the employer or under a policy of the employer.

“Date of hire” means the date of commencement of employment, but no later than the first day for which the employee is eligible for compensation.

“Days” means calendar days.

“Department” means the department of administration, division of taxation, or its designee.

“Dependent” includes a spouse or child or any other person who is in need of or entitled to support from a person who is declared to be legally liable for the support of that dependent.

“Employee” means a natural person who performs labor in this state and is employed by an employer in this state for compensation and for whom the employer withholds federal or state income tax from the employee’s compensation.

“Employer” means a person or entity doing business in this state who engages an employee for compensation and for whom the employer withholds federal or state tax liabilities from the employee’s compensation.

“Natural person” means an individual and not a corporation, government, business trust, estate, partnership, or other legal entity, however organized.

“W-4 form,” also known as the Employers Withholding Allowance Certificate, the form issued by the Internal Revenue Service of the United States to record the federal income tax withholding allowance available to each employer.

“Rehire” means the first day for which an employee is owed compensation by the employer following a termination of employment lasting a minimum of sixty (60) days. Termination of employment does not include temporary separations from employment such as unpaid leave of absence, or a temporary layoff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16; P.L. 2012, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 41, § 1.

15-24-4.
Employees obligation.

On or before the effective date of employment, an employee must complete the sections of the W-4 form pertaining to the employee’s name, address, date of birth, social security number, signature and date of signing, and submit the form to his or her employer. If an employee is being reinstated after a lapse in pay, the employee may, but is not required to, complete a new W-4 form.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-5.
Employer’s reporting requirements.

Beginning October 1, 1997, an employer who hires or rehires an employee on or after October 1, 1997, must report the hiring or rehiring of the employee to the department or its designee not later than fourteen (14) days after hire or rehire if reporting on a W-4 or its equivalent, or twice a month if reporting electronically or magnetically.

The report submitted shall contain the following:

The employer’s name, address, and federal identification number;

The employee’s name, address, social security number;

Information regarding whether the employer has employee dependent health care coverage available and the appropriate date on which the employee may qualify for the coverage; and

The address to which income withholding orders and garnishments should be sent.

Employers must report the information required under subsection (b) of this section by any of the following means:

By mailing a copy of the W-4 form. If a copy of the W-4 form is delivered by the United States Postal Service to the department after its due date, the postmark date stamped on the envelope is deemed to be the date of submission, provided that the copy of the W-4 form was mailed in the United States, first class, postage prepaid, and properly addressed in accordance with instructions provided;

By submitting a fax transmission of the W-4;

By transmission by magnetic tape or electronically in the format and tape layout prescribed by the department, in the case of an employer transmitting reports magnetically or electronically, by two (2) monthly transmissions not less than twelve (12) days, nor more than fifteen (15) days apart; or

any other means authorized by the department if the means will result in timely reporting and provided the employer obtains prior written approval to use those means. Use of alternative means of reporting shall not affect the obligation of the employer to submit the report within the time prescribed in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-6.
Transmission of wage withholding notices to employers.

Within two (2) business days after the date information regarding a newly-hired employee is entered into the state directory of new hires, the department shall forward a wage withholding order to the employer unless the employee’s income is not subject to withholding pursuant to §

15-5-24

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-7.
Failure to comply.

Any employer who fails to report as required under this section may be liable for a civil penalty of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each violation, to be assessed by the department, and shall be required to provide the information. If it is demonstrated that the employer conspired with the employee to avoid reporting, a five hundred dollar ($500) a civil penalty may be assessed by the department. Liability shall be joint and several.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16; P.L. 1998, ch. 370, § 3.

15-24-8.
Unauthorized disclosure of information.

Unauthorized disclosure of information caused by the department under these provisions, by any employee or agent of the state, is punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) per offense and is subject to administrative discipline of the employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.

15-24-9.
Department’s obligation.

The department must use information collected pursuant to this chapter to prevent tax evasion, fraud in financial assistance, benefits, or loan programs administrated by agencies including, but not limited to, the department of labor and training and the department of human services, and to assist the IV-D agency in locating absent parents and establishing, enforcing, and modifying child support orders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 16.